Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-128
Nebraska State Historical Society; acquire property of John G. Neihardt; erect structure; agreement; administration.

The Nebraska State Historical Society is hereby authorized to acquire, without cost to the state, clear title in the name of the State of Nebraska to the real and personal property of the John G. Neihardt Foundation and to construct on such real property a structure to be known as the John G. Neihardt Center. There is hereby appropriated to the Nebraska State Historical Society, Agency No. 54, the sum of two hundred thousand dollars for the purpose of constructing the John G. Neihardt Center. The Nebraska State Historical Society may enter into agreements with the John G. Neihardt Foundation for the operation of the John G. Neihardt Center but the society shall be responsible for the general administration and continued maintenance of such property and may accept gifts, grants, and bequests for such purposes.

Laws 1974, LB 855, § 1.